Montana, session 2025, SB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Evidentiary seizure of law enforcement weapons. (1) When law enforcement is
involved in an officer-involved shooting, the law enforcement officer's weapon involved in the shooting must be
collected by investigators to be photographed and turned over to the state laboratory of criminalistics for test
firing, collection of cartridge cases and rounds of ammunition, and to document the unique characteristics of the
weapon.
(2) After an investigation is complete and no appeals are pending or no criminal charges are filed
or are presently contemplated against the law enforcement officer, a weapon collected for evidence testing
pursuant to subsection (1) or collected as part of a coroner's inquest pursuant to 46-4-201 must be returned
within 7 days by whichever entity is appropriate to the law enforcement agency from which it was collected for
redeployment in the field.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
44, chapter 3, part 3, and the provisions of Title 44, chapter 3, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 288
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 288, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 288
INTRODUCED BY D. LOGE
AN ACT ESTABLISHING EVIDENTIARY SEIZURE GUIDELINES FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT WEAPONS IN
OFFICER-INVOLVED SHOOTINGS; AND REQUIRING THE EXPEDITED RETURN OF LAW ENFORCEMENT
WEAPONS UNDER CERTAIN CONDITIONS AFTER AN INVESTIGATION IS COMPLETE.